Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0622, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Provider certification and contract requirements for assertive community treatment. (a) The assertive community treatment provider must have each ACT team be certified by the state following the certification process and procedures developed by the commissioner. new text begin The commissioner must complete the processing of a certification application within 45 calendar days. new text end The certification process determines whether the ACT team meets the standards for assertive community treatment under this section, the standards in chapter 245I as required in section 245I.011, subdivision 5, and minimum program fidelity standards as measured by a nationally recognized fidelity tool approved by the commissioner. Recertification must occur at least every three years. (b) An ACT team certified under this subdivision must meet the following standards: (1) have capacity to recruit, hire, manage, and train required ACT team members; (2) have adequate administrative ability to ensure availability of services; (3) ensure flexibility in service delivery to respond to the changing and intermittent care needs of a client as identified by the client and the individual treatment plan; (4) keep all necessary records required by law; (5) be an enrolled Medicaid provider; and (6) establish and maintain a quality assurance plan to determine specific service outcomes and the client's satisfaction with services. (c) The commissioner may intervene at any time and decertify an ACT team with cause. The commissioner shall establish a process for decertification of an ACT team and shall require corrective action, medical assistance repayment, or decertification of an ACT team that no longer meets the requirements in this section or that fails to meet the clinical quality standards or administrative standards provided by the commissioner in the application and certification process. The decertification is subject to appeal to the state.